Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 2

Metropolitan Government—Adoption and Provisions of Charter

7-2-101. Metropolitan government charter commission — Creation — Methods of selecting members.

The initial step in a consolidation under this chapter shall be the creation of a metropolitan government charter commission, sometimes called “charter commission” in this chapter, by one (1) of the following methods:

The commission may be created by the adoption of a consolidation resolution by the governing body of a county and by the adoption of a substantially similar resolution by the governing body of the principal city in the county;

The resolution may be adopted by a majority vote of the members of such governing body present and voting, a quorum being present, at any regular meeting or at any meeting specially called to consider the resolution. The resolution shall provide that a metropolitan government charter commission is established to propose to the people the consolidation of all, or substantially all, of the governmental and corporate functions of the county and its principal city and the creation of a metropolitan government for the administration of the consolidated functions;

The resolution shall either:

Authorize the county mayor to appoint ten (10) commissioners, subject to confirmation by the county governing body, and authorize the mayor of the principal city to appoint five (5) commissioners, subject to confirmation by the city governing body; or

Provide that an election shall be held to select members of the metropolitan government charter commission;

It is the legislative intent that the persons appointed to the charter commission shall be broadly representative of all areas of the county and principal city and that every effort shall be made to include representatives from various political, social, and economic groups within the county and principal municipality;

Promptly after the adoption of the consolidation resolution by the governing body of a county, its clerk shall certify the fact of such adoption with a copy of the resolution to the clerk of the governing body of the principal city, and promptly after the adoption of a consolidation resolution by the governing body of the principal city, its clerk shall certify the fact of such adoption to the clerk of the governing body of the county;

When the resolutions of the governing bodies of the county and of the principal city shall provide for the appointment of commissioners of the county and city, the metropolitan government charter commission shall be created and duly constituted after appointments have been made and confirmed;

When the resolutions provide for an election to select members of the metropolitan government charter commission, copies of the resolution shall be certified by the clerks of the governing bodies to the county election commission, together with certificates as to the fact and date of adoption, and then an election shall be held as provided in § 7-2-102;

In any county having a metropolitan form of government in existence on January 1, 1977, the metropolitan mayor or county mayor is authorized to appoint five (5) commissioners, subject to confirmation by the county governing body, and the mayor of the principal city is authorized to appoint five (5) commissioners, subject to confirmation by the city governing body;

When the consolidation resolutions provide for the appointment of members of the metropolitan government charter commission, such appointments shall be made within thirty (30) days after the adoption of the resolution by the last governing body to do so, whether of the county or the principal city;

In counties having a board of county commissioners, a charter commission may be created by the adoption of a consolidation resolution by either the governing body of the county or the board of county commissioners and by the adoption of a substantially similar resolution by the governing body of the principal city in the county;

The resolution may be adopted by majority vote of the total number of members to which such governing body is entitled, or by a majority of the members of the board of county commissioners, at any regular or called meeting of such county governing body or board of county commissioners;

The resolution and the procedures concerning its adoption and certification and the appointment or election of members of the charter commission pursuant thereto shall be governed by subdivision (1), except that if members of the charter commission are to be appointed, the resolution shall authorize the county mayor to appoint six (6) commissioners, and the board of county commissioners to appoint six (6) commissioners, and the mayor of the principal city to appoint eight (8) commissioners;

The commissioners appointed by the mayor of the principal city shall be made subject to confirmation by the city governing body, and the commissioners appointed by the county mayor and by the board of county commissioners shall be made subject to confirmation by whichever of the county bodies first adopts a consolidation resolution, unless both bodies adopt a consolidation resolution on the same day, in which case, the commissioners appointed by the county mayor shall be confirmed by the county governing body and the commissioners appointed by the board of county commissioners shall not be subject to confirmation;

It is the legislative intent that the persons appointed shall be broadly representative of all areas of the county and principal city and that every effort shall be made to include representatives from various political, social and economic groups within the county and principal municipality;

The charter commission may be created in any county in the manner prescribed by private act of the general assembly; or

The commission may be created upon receipt of a petition, signed by qualified voters of the county, equal to at least ten percent (10%) of the number of votes cast in the county for governor in the last gubernatorial election;

The petition shall be delivered to the county election commission for certification. After the petition is certified, the county election commission shall deliver the petition to the governing body of the county and the governing body of the principal city in the county. The petition shall become the consolidation resolution of the county and the principal city in the county. The resolution shall provide that a metropolitan government charter commission is established to propose to the people the consolidation of all, or substantially all, of the government and corporate functions of the county and its principal city, and the creation of a metropolitan government for the administration of the consolidated functions;

The resolution shall either:

Authorize the county mayor to appoint ten (10) commissioners, subject to confirmation by the county governing body, and authorize the mayor of the principal city to appoint five (5) commissioners, subject to confirmation by the city governing body; or

Provide that an election shall be held to select members of the metropolitan government charter commission; provided, that if the governing body of the county and the governing body of the principal city cannot agree on the method of selecting members of the metropolitan government charter commission within sixty (60) days of certification, then an election shall be held to select members of the metropolitan government charter commission as provided in § 7-2-102;

It is the legislative intent that the persons appointed to the charter commission shall be broadly representative of all areas of the county and principal city and that every effort shall be made to include representatives from various political, social, and economic groups within the county and principal municipality;

When such resolution provides for the appointment of commissioners of the county and city, the metropolitan government charter commission shall be created and duly constituted after appointments have been made and confirmed;

When the resolution provides for an election to select members of the metropolitan government charter commission, copies of the resolution shall be certified by the clerks of the governing bodies to the county election commission, and then an election shall be held as provided in § 7-2-102;

When the consolidation resolution provides for the appointment of members of the metropolitan government charter commission, the appointments shall be made within thirty (30) days after the resolution is submitted to the governing bodies of the county and the principal city; and

If the referendum to approve consolidation fails, another commission may not be created by petition for three (3) years.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 4; 1961, ch. 199, § 1; modified; 1977, ch. 481, §§ 1-6; modified; T.C.A., § 6-3704; Acts 1989, ch. 576, §§ 1, 2, 7; 1998, ch. 1101, § 18; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Because of the limited applicability of Acts 1989, ch. 576, the amendments by that act have been placed in notes, rather than incorporated into the text of the section. However, the history line for the section has been updated to reflect the amendment by that act. Section 7 of that act provided that 1989 amendments shall only apply to counties having a population of more than two hundred thousand (200,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent census, and having only two (2) municipalities within the county.

Acts 1989, ch. 576, § 1, effective June 8, 1989, amended (1)(B)(i) to read: “Authorize the county executive [now county mayor] to appoint nine (9) commissioners, at least one (1) of whom must be of African American descent, subject to confirmation by the county governing body and authorize the mayor of the principal city to appoint six (6) commissioners, at least one (1) of whom must be of African American descent, subject to confirmation by the city governing body and authorize the mayor of any other municipality within the county to appoint one (1) commissioner, subject to confirmation by such municipality's governing body;”.

Acts 1989, ch. 576, § 2, effective June 8, 1989, amended (1)(D) to read: “(D) Promptly after the adoption of the consolidation resolution by the governing body of a county, its clerk shall certify the fact of such adoption with a copy of the resolution to the clerk of the governing body of the principal city and the governing body of the principal city shall act upon such resolution within sixty (60) days of the receipt thereof. Failure of the governing body to so act shall render this effort at consolidation void. Promptly after the adoption of a consolidation resolution by the governing body of the principal city, the clerk shall certify the fact of such adoption to the clerk of the governing body of the county.”

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — 1962 Tennessee Survey (James C. Kirby, Jr.), 16 Vand. L. Rev. 649 (1963).

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 89-140, 1989 Tenn. AG LEXIS 140 (12/8/89).

Procedure for county adoption of a metropolitan form of government, OAG 98-0133, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 133 (8/6/98).

7-2-102. Election of members.

No less than forty-six (46) days nor more than sixty (60) days after the adoption of a consolidation resolution by the governing bodies of a county and of its principal city, which resolution providing for an election of the members of a metropolitan government charter commission, it shall be the duty of the county election commission to hold a special election to elect members of the charter commission.

The cost of the election shall be paid out of county funds.

The ten (10) candidates receiving the highest total vote in the election shall be elected as members of the metropolitan government charter commission.

Any qualified voter of the county shall be eligible for election as a member of the charter commission.

The deadline for filing nominating petitions for candidates for the charter commission is twelve o'clock (12:00) noon of the fortieth day before the election.

Acts 1963, ch. 260, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(60); impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; T.C.A., § 6-3705.

7-2-103. Organization of charter commission — Officers and personnel — Compensation — Vacancies.

The members of the charter commission shall hold an organizational meeting at the courthouse at ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.) on the fifth day following their appointment or election, or at such subsequent date and place as a majority of the members may assemble.

The metropolitan government charter commission shall be authorized to elect a chair, a secretary, and such other officers as it may deem necessary.

The charter commission shall be authorized to employ such staff as may be required to assist it in drafting a charter for a single metropolitan government, which shall consolidate county and city functions as provided in this chapter and which shall be proposed for adoption.

Members of the charter commission shall not receive per diem or other compensation for their services, except reimbursement of actual expenses by members.

The staff employed by the commission shall be paid compensation as determined by the charter commission within the limits of funds available to it under this chapter.

Vacancies in the office of charter commission shall be filled by the remaining members.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 5; 1961, ch. 199, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-3706; Acts 1989, ch. 576, §§ 3, 4, 7.

Code Commission Notes.

Because of the limited applicability of Acts 1989, ch. 576, the amendments by that act have been placed in these Code Commission Notes, rather than incorporated into the text of the section. However, the history line for the section has been updated to reflect the amendment by that act. Section 7 of the act provided the amendments only apply to counties having a population of more than two hundred thousand (200,000) according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent census, and having only two (2) municipalities within the county.

Acts 1989, ch. 576, § 3, effective June 8, 1989, amended (a) to read: “(a) The county clerk shall call and convene members of the charter commission to hold an organizational meeting at the courthouse at ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.) on the fifth day following their appointment or, if elected, on the fifth day following their certification.”

Acts 1989, ch. 576, § 4, effective June 8, 1989, amended (f) to read: “(f) Any vacancy occurring in the office of the charter commission of appointed members shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment subject to approval by the local governing body. Any vacancy occurring in the office of the charter commission of elected members shall be filled by appointment of the county executive [now county mayor] subject to approval by the local governing body.”

7-2-104. Appropriation for charter commission — Disbursement — Cooperation from public officials.

Whenever any charter commission is established as provided in this chapter, it shall be the duty of the governing body of the county to appropriate sufficient funds to defray the expenses of the commission, which appropriation shall be not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Such funds shall be disbursed by the county mayor or other fiscal officer of the county upon vouchers or warrants signed by the chair and the secretary of the commission.

All public officials shall, upon request, furnish the commission with all information and assistance necessary or appropriate for its work.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 6; 1961, ch. 199, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 6-3707; Acts 1989, ch. 576, §§ 5, 7; 1997, ch. 261, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Because of the limited applicability of Acts 1989, ch. 576, the amendments by that act have been placed in these Code Commission Notes, rather than incorporated into the text of the section. However, the history line for the section has been updated to reflect the amendment by that act. Section 7 of the act provided the amendments only apply to counties having a population of more than two hundred thousand (200,000) according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent census, and having only two (2) municipalities within the county.

Acts 1989, ch. 576, § 5, effective June 8, 1989, amended (a) by substituting “seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000)” for “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)”.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Creation of metropolitan government charter commissions, §7-2-101.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

7-2-105. Preparation and filing of proposed charter — Publication.

Any charter commission established under this chapter shall prepare and file the charter proposed by it not later than nine (9) months after the date of its initial meeting, or within such extended limit of time as may be authorized by resolution of the governing bodies of the county and principal city. Copies of the proposed charter shall be filed with the county clerk, with the city clerk of each incorporated municipality in the county and with the county election commission. The copies shall be public records, available for inspection or examination by any interested person. The charter commission shall also furnish or make available to every daily or weekly newspaper published in the county a complete copy of the charter. The charter commission shall take such other steps within the limitation of its available funds as it deems reasonable and appropriate to inform the public throughout the county of the contents of the proposed charter, and the proposed charter may be published or summarized in pamphlets and booklets to be made available for general distribution.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 6-3708.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Procedure for county adoption of a metropolitan form of government, OAG 98-0133, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 133 (8/6/98).

7-2-106. Referendum on proposed charter.

After a copy of the proposed charter has been certified to the county election commission, as provided in § 7-2-105, it shall be the duty of the county election commission to hold a special referendum election for the ratification or rejection of the proposed charter. The ballot shall be prepared so as to provide a choice for voters between:

For Consolidation of and (Name of city) (Name of county) Against Consolidation of and (Name of city) (Name of county)

Click to view form.

The special referendum election shall be held on a date fixed by the county election commission not less than eighty (80) days nor more than one hundred (100) days subsequent to the filing of the charter as provided in § 7-2-105. Notice of the referendum election shall be given as required in other elections on questions submitted to the vote of the people. The date of the election and the form of ballot shall be uniform throughout the entire county, but the county election commission shall canvass the returns and certify the results as if separate elections were being held for the principal city and for the area of the county outside of the principal city of the county. For the purpose of determining whether the proposed charter has been accepted or rejected, the county election commission shall canvass the returns and certify the results:

For the principal city; and

For the entire area of the county outside of the principal city, including in such area the smaller cities, if any, within the county.

The proposed charter shall be deemed ratified and adopted if the proposed charter is approved by a majority of those voting within the principal city and also a majority of those voting in the county outside of the principal city.

The proposed charter shall be deemed rejected and shall not become effective if it is disapproved by a majority of those voting in the principal city. The proposed charter shall also be deemed rejected and shall not become effective if it is disapproved by a majority of those voting in the county outside of the principal city.

The returns of the referendum election shall be certified by the county election commission to the secretary of state, together with a copy of the charter previously filed with the county election commission by the charter commission. Thereupon, the secretary of state shall issue a proclamation showing the result of the election on the adoption or rejection of the proposed charter, one (1) copy of which proclamation shall be attached to the copy of the charter certified to the secretary of state and one (1) copy of which shall be delivered to the county clerk, who shall attach the proclamation to the copy of the charter certified to the county clerk. Whenever a charter for metropolitan government has been adopted, the two (2) certified copies with proclamations attached to the certified copies shall be deemed duplicate original copies of the charter of the metropolitan government. The certified copy of the charter and proclamation deposited with the county clerk shall subsequently be delivered by the county clerk to the officer of the metropolitan government that the metropolitan charter may direct.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 8; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(61); impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 6-3709.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Procedure for county adoption of a metropolitan form of government, OAG 98-0133, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 133 (8/6/98).

In a referendum on the question of whether to ratify or reject a metropolitan charter, a person who owns property in the principal city but who lives in the outlying county may not vote in both the election for the principal city and for the county outside of the principal city, OAG 05-115 (7/26/05), 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 117.

Voting under Charter Government Unification Act and Metropolitan Government Act. OAG 10-51, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 51 (4/15/10).

7-2-107. Smaller cities — Inclusion in proposed consolidation — Referendum.

After a charter commission has been created, any smaller city within the county may by action of its legislative body appoint a representative to consult with the charter commission concerning the terms upon which the functions of such smaller city may be included in the proposed consolidation. Any terms proposed by the charter commission with respect to the smaller city shall be filed and published separately as an appendix to the metropolitan charter proposed with respect to the principal city, and shall be submitted independently in a special referendum election for ratification or rejection by the voters of the smaller city and by the voters of the county outside the smaller city in a manner similar to that provided in §§ 7-2-105 and 7-2-106 with respect to the proposed metropolitan charter for the principal city.

The appendix shall be deemed ratified and adopted if it is approved by a majority of those voting within the smaller city and also by a majority of those voting in the county outside of such smaller city, but shall not become effective unless the proposed metropolitan charter with respect to the principal city and the county is ratified and adopted.

The appendix shall be deemed rejected and shall not become effective if it is disapproved by a majority of those voting in the smaller city. It shall also be deemed rejected and shall not become effective if it is disapproved by a majority of those voting in the county outside of such smaller city.

The returns of the referendum election on the proposed appendix shall be certified and proclaimed in a manner similar to that provided in § 7-2-106 with respect to the proposed metropolitan charter for the principal city.

Where a proposed charter of metropolitan government is ratified by a majority of those voting in a principal city and of those voting in the county outside of the principal city, but a smaller city continues, either because a proposed appendix has been rejected or no such appendix has been proposed, the smaller city shall become a part of the general services district, but the smaller city may not thereafter be included within the urban services district by action of the metropolitan council.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 9; T.C.A., § 6-3710.

Cross-References. Excluded smaller cities, inclusion within metropolitan government, §7-1-106.

Attorney General Opinions. Two cities contained in a metropolitan government cannot comprise two separate urban services districts subject to different property tax levies to accommodate the outstanding debt and assets of each city prior to the establishment of the metropolitan government, OAG 01-17, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/6/01).